Maine, session 132, LD929.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2421-A, sub-§39, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
39. Qualifying patient. "Qualifying patient" means an individual who is a senior, a
veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or has been a resident of the State for at
least 30 days and who possesses a valid written certification regarding medical use of
cannabis in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2421-A, sub-§48-A is enacted to read:
48-A. Senior. "Senior" means an individual who is 65 years of age or older.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2421-A, sub-§54, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
54. Written certification. "Written certification" means a document signed by a
medical provider and issued to a qualifying patient, or a digital image of that document
issued by the medical provider that states that, in the medical provider's professional
opinion, the patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the medical
use of cannabis to treat or alleviate the patient's medical diagnosis or symptoms associated
with the medical diagnosis. "Written certification" includes:
A. For a senior, a government-issued identification card; and
B. For a veteran:
(1) An identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense;
(2) A veteran health identification card or other identification card issued by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(3) A veteran designation or other mark signifying the patient is a veteran on a
government-issued identification card.